Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.76.509

Highway worker memorial scholarship account.

The highway worker memorial scholarship account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. Moneys received from legislative appropriations and transfers, private donations, public or private gifts and grants, conveyances, and other sources may be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be made only for the purposes of providing scholarships to children and surviving spouses of highway workers who lost his or her life or became totally disabled while employed by a general contractor or subcontractor on a state transportation project. Children and surviving spouses must apply to the office of student financial assistance, and if found to be eligible, may receive a scholarship in an amount of the annual cost of tuition at the enrolled individual's institution of higher education or the cost of undergraduate tuition and state-mandated fees at the most expensive Washington state public university, whichever is less. Eligible individuals may receive up to four annual scholarships. Scholarships will be provided on a first-come, first-served basis subject to the availability of moneys in the account. Disbursements from the account may be authorized only by the office of student financial assistance or the Washington student achievement council. An appropriation is not required for expenditures, but the account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 956.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 1: See note following RCW 43.41.455.